Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,152
Ambulances; hearses; registration fee.

For all ambulances, except publicly owned ambulances, and hearses, the registration fee shall be fifteen dollars.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 152.